North Carolina, session 2025, SB450.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 90-89(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) Opiates. – Any of the following opiates or opioids, including the isomers,
esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically
excepted, or listed in another schedule, whenever the existence of such
isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
…
rrr. Brorphine.
sss. AP-237.
ttt. 2-methyl AP-237.
uuu. (ortho, meta, or para)-methyl AP-237.
vvv. AP-238.
www. (ortho, meta, or para)-hydroxy 2-methyl AP-237.
xxx. 2-Naphthyl U-47700.
yyy. 1-Naphthyl U-47700.
zzz. 4-(Trifluoromethyl) U-47700.
aaaa. Methoxy U-47700.
bbbb. Furanyl UF-17.
cccc. Cyclopropyl U-47700.
dddd. Phenyl U-47700.
eeee. Ethyl U-47700.
ffff. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro-N,N-didesmethyl U-47700.
gggg. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro U-49900.
hhhh. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro-N-desmethyl U-47700.
iiii. 4-fluoro U-47931E.
jjjj. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro U-51754.
kkkk. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro Isopropyl U-47700.
llll. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro Propyl U-47700.
mmmm. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro U-50488.
nnnn. (2,3- or 3,4)-difluoro U-48800.
oooo. (2,3- or 3,4 or 2,4)-difluoro U-47700.
pppp. UF-17.
qqqq. U-47109.
*S450-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
rrrr. U-48520.
ssss. N,N-didesmethyl U-47700.
tttt. U-62066.
uuuu. Propyl U-47700.
vvvv. (2,3- or 3,4)-Ethylenedioxy U-51754.
wwww. 4-phenyl U-51754.
xxxx. N-desmethyl U-47700.
yyyy. (2,3- or 3,4)-Ethylenedioxy U-47700.
zzzz. N-methyl U-47931E.
aaaaa. (2,3- or 3,4)-Methylenedioxy U-47700.
bbbbb. U-69593.
ccccc. U-50488.
ddddd. U-48753E.
eeeee. U-47931E.
fffff. Butonitazene.
ggggg. Etodesnitazene (also known as Etonitazepyne).
hhhhh. Flunitazene.
iiiii. Metodesnitazene.
jjjjj. N-Pyrrolidino Etonitazene.
kkkkk. Protonitazene."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 90-89(1a) reads as rewritten:
"(1a) Fentanyl derivatives. – Unless specifically excepted, listed in another
schedule, or contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration, any compound structurally
derived from N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(Fentanyl) by any substitution on or replacement of the phenethyl group, any
substitution on the piperidine ring, any substitution on or replacement of the
propanamide group, any substitution on the anilido phenyl group, or any
combination of the above unless specifically excepted or listed in another
schedule to include their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. Fentanyl
derivatives include, but are not limited to, the following:
…
f.
N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propana
mide (also known as 2-fluorofentanyl).(also known as
ortho-fluorofentanyl).
g.
N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propana
mide (also known as 3-fluorofentanyl).(also known as
meta-fluorofentanyl).
h.
N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carbox
amide (also known as tetrahydrofuran fentanyl).
i.
N-(4-fluorophenyl)-2-methyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]
-propanamid e (also known as 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl,
4-FIBF).(also known as 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl).
j. N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide
(also known as 4-fluorobutyryl fentanyl, 4-FBF).(also known as
4-fluorobutyryl fentanyl)."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 90-89 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
Page 2 Senate Bill 450-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(1b) Nitazene derivatives. – The N-substituted benzimidazole structural class,
including any of the following derivatives, their salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers unless specifically utilized as part of the manufacturing process by a
commercial industry of a substance or material not intended for human
ingestion or consumption, as a prescription administered under medical
supervision, or for research at a recognized institution, whenever the existence
of these salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation or unless specifically excepted or listed in this or another
schedule, structurally derived from benzimidazole by substitution at the
1-position nitrogen with an ethylamine group, and by substitution at the
2-position carbon with a benzyl group, whether or not the compound is further
modified in any of the following ways:
a. By monoalkyl or dialkyl substitution on the 1'-nitrogen of the
1-position ethylamine group, or by inclusion of the nitrogen in a cyclic
structure;
b. By substitution on the 2'-methylene carbon of the benzyl group by
alkyl or carboxamide groups;
c. By replacement of the 2'-methylene carbon group with an ethylbenzyl,
thiophenol, or methoxybenzene group, which may be further
substituted with alkyl, hydroxyl, alkoxy, acetoxy, halide, or sulfide
groups;
d. By substitution at the 2'-position, 3'-position, or 4'-position of the
benzyl group, or both, with alkyl, hydroxyl, alkoxy, acetoxy, halide,
or sulfide groups; and
e. By replacement of a phenyl hydrogen atom at either the 5-position or
6-position of the benzimidazole core with a nitro, or primary amine
group."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 90-89(3)mm. reads as rewritten:
"mm. 5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-propyltryptamine
5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-MiPT)."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 90-89(5)j. reads as rewritten:
"j. Substituted cathinones. A compound, other than bupropion, that is
structurally derived from 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone by
modification in any of the following ways: (i) by substitution in the
phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, haloalkyl,
or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the phenyl
ring by one or more other univalent substituents; (ii) by substitution at
the 3-position to any extent; or (iii) by substitution at the nitrogen atom
with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, cycloalkyl, or methoxybenzyl groups or by
inclusion of the nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure. For the purpose of
this paragraph, the term "isomer" includes the optical, positional, or
geometric isomer."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 90-89(7) reads as rewritten:
"(7) Synthetic cannabinoids. – Any quantity of any synthetic chemical compound
that (i) is a cannabinoid receptor agonist and mimics the pharmacological
effect of naturally occurring substances or (ii) has a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is not listed as a
controlled substance in Schedules I through V, and is not an FDA-approved
drug. Synthetic cannabinoids include, but are not limited to, the substances
listed in sub-subdivisions a. through p. r. of this subdivision and any substance
that contains any quantity of their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional,
Senate Bill 450-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or geometric), homologues, and salts of isomers and homologues, unless
specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers,
homologues, and salts of isomers and homologues is possible within the
specific chemical designation. The following substances are examples of
synthetic cannabinoids and are not intended to be inclusive of the substances
included in this Schedule:
…
n. Indazole carboxaldehydes. Any compound structurally derived from
1H-indazole-3-carboxaldehyde or 1H-indazole-2-carboxaldehyde
substituted in both of the following ways:
…
2. At the carbon of the carboxaldehyde by a phenyl, benzyl,
naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group;
whether or not the compound is further modified to any extent
in the following ways: (i) substitution to the indazole ring to
any extent, (ii) substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl,
adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group to any
extent, (iii) a nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indazole ring,
or (iv) a nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl,
naphthyl, adamantyl, or cyclopropyl ring.
o. Indazole carboxamides. Any compound structurally derived from
1H-indazole-3-carboxamide or 1H-indazole-2-carboxamide
substituted in both of the following ways:
…
2. At the nitrogen of the carboxamide by a phenyl, benzyl,
naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group;
whether or not the compound is further modified to any extent
in the following ways: (i) substitution to the indazole ring to
any extent, (ii) substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl,
adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group to any
extent, (iii) a nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indazole ring,
or (iv) a nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl,
naphthyl, adamantyl, or cyclopropyl ring. Substances in this
class include, but are not limited to: AKB-48, fluoro-AKB-48,
APINCACA, AB-PINACA, AB-FUBINACA,
ADB-FUBINACA, and ADB-PINACA.
…."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 90-90(2)h1. reads as rewritten:
"h1. Fentanyl immediate precursor chemical,
4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine
(ANPP).4-anilino-N-phenethylpiperdine (ANPP)."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 90-91(k)11. reads as rewritten:
"11. Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone,Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone,"
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 90-91(k)16. reads as rewritten:
"16. Mesterolene,Mesterolone,"
SECTION 2. This act is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed
on or after that date.
Page 4 Senate Bill 450-First Edition